Utah statutes.
53A-2-102.   Consolidation of school districts -- Resolution by school board
members -- Petition by electors -- Election.
(1)  Two or more school districts may unite and form a single school district
in one of the following ways:
(a)  a majority of the members of each of the boards of education of the
affected districts shall approve and present to the county legislative body of
the affected counties a resolution to consolidate the districts.  Once this is
done, consolidation shall be established under this chapter; or
(b)  a majority of the members of the board of education of each affected
district, or 15% of the qualified electors in each of the affected districts,
shall sign and present a petition to the county legislative body of each
affected county. The question shall be voted upon at an election called for
that purpose, which shall be the next general or municipal election.
Consolidation shall occur if a majority of those voting on the question in
each district favor consolidation.
(2)  The elections required under Subsection (1) (b) shall be conducted and
the returns canvassed as provided by election laws.
